Illinois, session 104th, HB4342.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-817 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-817 new)8    Sec. 2505-817. Mobile home subsidy program.9    (a) For calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 102027, subject to appropriation, the Department of Revenue 11shall administer a program to provide assistance to qualified 12mobile home owners who have experienced rent increases 13associated with lots in mobile home parks. 14    (b) Qualified mobile home owners shall apply to the 15Department of Revenue for an annual rent subsidy in the form 16and manner required by the Department of Revenue by rule. The 17Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the implementation 18and administration of this program, including, but not limited 19to, rules establishing application deadlines and application 20forms. 21    (c) The amount of the rent subsidy may not exceed the 22lesser of (i) the difference between the mobile home lot rent 23required to be paid by the qualified mobile home owner in the   HB4342- 2 -LRB104 17185 HLH 30604 b1calendar year for which the subsidy is awarded minus the 2mobile home lot rent required to be paid by the qualified 3mobile home owner in the base year or (ii) $1,500 per mobile 4home park lot per calendar year. If the qualified mobile home 5owner did not reside at the mobile home park for the entire 6base year, then the mobile home lot rent required to be paid by 7the qualified mobile home owner in the base year shall be 8calculated by multiplying the average monthly lot rent paid by 9the qualified mobile home owner in the base year by 12. The 10subsidy awarded under this Section may be paid directly to the 11qualified mobile home owner or to the park owner. 12    (d) As used in this Section: 13    "Base year" means the calendar year immediately preceding 14the calendar year for which the subsidy under this Section is 15first awarded. 16    "Household income" has the meaning given to that term in 17Section 15-172 of the Property Tax Code. 18    "Mobile home park" has the meaning given to that term in 19Section 3 of the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Rights Act. 20    "Qualified mobile home owner" means an individual who (i) 21is 65 years of age or older during the calendar year for which 22the subsidy under this Section is awarded, (ii) has an 23ownership interest in a mobile home that is located in a mobile 24home park or a manufactured home that is located in a mobile 25home park, (iii) uses the mobile home or manufactured home as 26the individual's principal dwelling place during the base year   HB4342- 3 -LRB104 17185 HLH 30604 b1and during the calendar year for which the subsidy is awarded, 2and (iv) has a household income that does not exceed the 3maximum income limitation defined in Section 15-172 of the 4Property Tax Code.  5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.